Hawaii statutes.
[PART
II.] BREASTFEEDING IN PUBLIC ACCOMMODATIONS

[§489-21] Discriminatory practices;
breastfeeding. It is a discriminatory practice to deny, or attempt to
deny, the full and equal enjoyment of the goods, services, facilities,
privileges, advantages, and accommodations of a place of public accommodations
to a woman because she is breastfeeding a child. [L 2000, c 227, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next